Colorado, session 2026A, SB129.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-31-103, add
(14.5) as follows:
30-31-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 31, unless the context otherwise requires:
(14.5) "TAXING ENTITY" MEANS A PUBLIC BODY THAT LEVIES
SALES OR PROPERTY TAXES AND WHOSE TAX REVENUE IS ALLOCATED AS
PART OF A PROPOSED OR FINALIZED COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN
PURSUANT TO SECTION 30-31-109 (13).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-31-109, add
(3)(d) as follows:
30-31-109. Approval of county revitalization plans by local
governing body - definitions.
(3) (d) WITHIN FORTY-FIVE DAYS OF A COUNTY OR AUTHORITY
SUBMITTING A COUNTY REVITALIZATION IMPACT REPORT IN CONNECTION
WITH A COUNTY REVITALIZATION PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
-2- SB26-129

SUBSECTION (3), EACH TAXING ENTITY IMPACTED BY THAT PLAN SHALL
FILE EITHER A CERTIFICATION OF OR A TECHNICAL REBUTTAL TO THE
COUNTY REVITALIZATION IMPACT REPORT. IF A TAXING ENTITY DOES NOT
FILE EITHER A CERTIFICATION OR A TECHNICAL REBUTTAL, THE COUNTY
REVITALIZATION IMPACT REPORT IS PRESUMED CERTIFIED.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-25-103, add (7.3)
as follows:
31-25-103. Definitions.
As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:
(7.3) "TAXING ENTITY" MEANS A PUBLIC BODY THAT LEVIES SALES
OR PROPERTY TAXES AND WHOSE TAX REVENUE INCREMENT IS ALLOCATED
AS PART OF A PROPOSED OR FINALIZED URBAN RENEWAL PLAN PURSUANT
TO SECTION 31-25-107 (9)(a).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-25-107, add
(3.5)(d) and (14) as follows:
31-25-107. Approval of urban renewal plans by local
governing body - definitions.
(3.5) (d) WITHIN FORTY-FIVE DAYS OF AN AUTHORITY SUBMITTING
AN URBAN RENEWAL IMPACT REPORT IN CONNECTION WITH AN URBAN
RENEWAL PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (3.5), EACH
TAXING ENTITY IMPACTED BY THAT PLAN SHALL FILE EITHER A
CERTIFICATION OF OR A TECHNICAL REBUTTAL TO THE URBAN RENEWAL
IMPACT REPORT. IF A TAXING ENTITY DOES NOT FILE EITHER A
CERTIFICATION OR A TECHNICAL REBUTTAL, THE URBAN RENEWAL IMPACT
REPORT IS PRESUMED CERTIFIED.
(14) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE
OCTOBER 1 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF
-3- SB26-129

SHALL PREPARE A REPORT OR ISSUE BRIEF ON THE IMPACT OF TAX
INCREMENT FINANCING ON THE STATE AND LOCAL SHARES OF EDUCATION
FUNDING. THE REPORT OR ISSUE BRIEF MUST QUANTIFY THE TOTAL
AMOUNT OF PROPERTY TAX REVENUE COLLECTED IN THE STATE IN THE
PREVIOUS FISCAL YEAR THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN DIRECTED TO FUNDING
EDUCATION IF NOT FOR TAX INCREMENT FINANCING.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 31-25-807, add (5)
as follows:
31-25-807. Powers - duties.
(5) WITHIN FORTY-FIVE DAYS AFTER A BOARD OR GOVERNING
BODY HAS SUBMITTED AN IMPACT REPORT RELATED TO TAX INCREMENT
FINANCING, EACH TAXING ENTITY THAT IS PROPOSED TO BE INCLUDED IN
THE TAX INCREMENT FINANCING PLAN SHALL FILE EITHER A CERTIFICATION
OF OR A TECHNICAL REBUTTAL TO THE IMPACT REPORT. IF A TAXING
ENTITY DOES NOT FILE EITHER A CERTIFICATION OR A TECHNICAL
REBUTTAL, THE IMPACT REPORT IS PRESUMED CERTIFIED.
SECTION 6. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- SB26-129